North Carolina, session 2025, SB661.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall study
the following issues affecting women who serve in the military:
(1) Coordinating effectively between veterans health care facilities and
non-veterans health care facilities in the delivery of maternity care and other
health care services.
(2) Facilitating access to community resources to address social determinants of
health, including housing, nutrition, and employment status.
(3) Identifying mental and behavioral health risk factors in the prenatal and
postpartum periods and ensuring that pregnant and postpartum veterans get
the treatments they need.
(4) Facilitating access to childbirth preparation classes, parenting classes,
nutrition counseling, breastfeeding support, lactation classes, and breast
pumps.
(5) Reducing maternal mortality and severe maternal morbidity, with a particular
focus on racial and ethnic disparities in maternal health outcomes.
SECTION 1.(b) In conducting the study required by subsection (a) of this section,
the Department of Health and Human Services shall solicit feedback from mothers who are
currently serving, or who formerly served, in the military. In addition, the DHHS shall consult
with the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs (DMVA), as necessary. The DMVA shall
cooperate with the DHHS and provide any assistance or information requested with respect to
the study required by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.(c) By April 1, 2026, the DHHS shall report its findings, and any
recommendations for legislation, to the Senate Health Care Committee, the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on General Government, and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the purpose of conducting the study described in Section
1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S661-v-1*